Hawaii statutes.
§607-3 Court costs, waiver of prepayment,
reduction or remission of. The judges of all the courts of the State shall
have discretionary power to waive the prepayment of costs or to reduce or remit
costs where, in special or extraordinary cases, the cost of any suit, action,
or proceeding may, to the judges, appear onerous. [L 1923, c 101, §§1, 2; RL
1925, §2545; RL 1935, §3794; am L 1939, c 19, §3; RL 1945, §9743; RL 1955,
§219-3; HRS §607-3; am L 1970, c 188, §39; am L 1972, c 88, §5(b)]

Case Notes

Where payment of $275 in fees well exceeded prisoner
petitioner's meager earnings and "savings" and, thus, would be
excessively burdensome, to require the payment of such costs under the
circumstances clearly exceeded "the bounds of reason"; thus, it was an
abuse of discretion for the trial court to deny petitioner's request to proceed
in forma pauperis pursuant to this section. 113 H. 315, 151 P.3d 796 (2007).

In exercising discretion, court may consider movants' estate
or their net worth. 2 H. App. 1, 625 P.2d 378 (1981).

Cited: 31 H. 242, 254 (1930); 32 H. 385, 386 (1932); 35 H.
563 (1940); 35 H. 564 (1940); 35 H. 682 (1940); 44 H. 613, 623, 359 P.2d 932
(1961).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next